Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB786.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8703(a) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8703. Eligibility and qualification requirements.(a) Eligibility standards.--The following requirements shall be used to determine the eligibility of applicants for educational gratuity payments. The applicant shall be:(1) Not less than 16 years of age nor more than 23 years of age.(2) The child of an eligible disabled or deceased veteran.(3) A resident of this Commonwealth for a period of [five years] one year immediately preceding the date the application was filed.12345678910111213141516171819 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0786PN0807 - 2 - 12